Arkansas, session 2025, SB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 5, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-5-325. Designated restrooms for campaign workers and volunteers.
(a) A county board of election commissioners may designate restroom
facilities to be used by campaign workers or volunteers at a polling site.
(b) A campaign worker or volunteer working outside of the polling site
may use restroom facilities in the polling site designated by the county
board of election commissioners under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Before entering the polling site to use the designated restroom
facilities under this section, a campaign worker or volunteer:
(1) Shall cover or remove campaign material advocating voting
for or against a:
(A) Candidate; or
*SSS181*
03/19/2025 8:08:27 AM SSS181

SB517
(B) Position on a ballot measure;
(2) Shall not attempt to solicit votes; and
(3) Shall not interact or engage with a poll worker.
(d) A campaign worker or volunteer who enters the polling site and
violates subsection (c) of this section is guilty of electioneering under §
7-1-103(a)(8).






























03/19/2025 8:08:27 AM SSS181